Massachusetts, session 194th, S1556.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 196 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “dwelling”, in line 4, the following
words:- “or outdoor structure”.
of 1